Vermont, session 2025-2026, H153.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. § 5016 is amended to read:
§ 5016. BIRTH AND DEATH CERTIFICATES; COPIES; INSPECTION
* * *
(b) Certified copies.
* * *
(2) Only the following persons shall be eligible for a certified copy of a
birth or death certificate:
(A) the registrant or his or her the registrant’s spouse, child,
grandchild, parent, sibling, grandparent, aunt, uncle, nephew, niece, or
guardian; a person petitioning to open a decedent’s estate; a court-appointed
executor or administrator; or the legal representative of any of these;
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379205 v.1